Massachusetts, session 194th, S3026.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 15 of chapter 71 of the General Laws or any other 
general or special law to the contrary, the towns of Bernardston, Gill, Leyden, Northfield, 
Warwick and Montague shall have placed on the ballot at the first annual or special town 
election following the effective date of this act a question to the voters of accepting the creation 
of a new regional school district. The question on the printed ballots to be used at such election 
shall be in substantially the following form: 
“Shall the town accept the provisions of sections 16 to 16I, inclusive, of chapter 71 of the 
General Laws providing for the establishment of a regional school district, consisting of the 
towns of Bernardston, Gill, Leyden, Northfield, Warwick and Montague, and for construction, 
maintenance and operation of a regional school by said district in accordance with the provisions 
of a proposed agreement filed with the select board?” 

of 2 12  If a majority of the voters present and voting on said question in each of the towns shall 
vote in the affirmative the proposed regional school district shall be deemed to be established 
forthwith, but not otherwise. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.